District of Columbia statutes.
2-1219.23

Repealed

Tax increment revenue bonds.

Repealed.

Sept. 11, 1998, D.C. Law 12-144, § 24, 45 DCR 3747
Oct. 16, 1998, D.C. Law 12-169, § 301(h), 45 DCR 5187
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 103(a), 55 DCR 1689
1981 Ed., § 1-2295.23.